North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55C. Foreign Trade Zones.
§ 55C-1.
Public corporations authorized to apply for privilege of establishing a foreign trade zone.

Any public corporation of the State of North Carolina, as that term is hereinafter defined is hereby authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with an act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled, “An Act to Provide for the Establishment, Operation and Maintenance of Foreign Trade Zones in Ports of Entry of the United States,” to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 132.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on taxation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 1128 (1978).

§ 55C-2.
“Public corporation” defined.

The term “public corporation” for the purposes of this Chapter, means the State of North Carolina or any political subdivision thereof, or any public agency of this State or any political subdivision thereof, or any public board, bureau, commission or authority created by the General Assembly, or a corporate municipal instrumentality of one or more states.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 132; 2013-342, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-342, s. 2, effective July 23, 2013, added “, or a corporate municipal instrumentality of one or more states” at the end of the section.

§ 55C-3.
Private corporations authorized to apply for privilege of establishing a foreign trade zone.

Any private corporation hereafter organized under the laws of this State for the specific purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the act of Congress referred to in

G.S. 55C-1

is likewise authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign trade zone in accordance with the said act of Congress.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 132.

§ 55C-4.
Public or private corporation establishing foreign trade zone to be governed by federal law.

Any public or private corporation authorized by this Chapter to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating, and maintaining said foreign trade zone, whose application is granted pursuant to the terms of the aforementioned act of Congress is hereby authorized to establish such foreign trade zone and to operate and maintain the same subject to the conditions and restrictions of the said act of Congress and any amendments thereto, and under such rules and regulations and for the period of time that may be prescribed by the board established by said act of Congress to carry out the provisions of such act.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 132; 1977, c. 782, s. 1.